Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB780.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIX-IEARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATOR TUITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAMSection 1901-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance 12345678910111213141516171819 Agency."Applicant." An individual enrolled or accepted for enrollment at a community college in an early childhood program."Community college." A public college or technical institute which is established and operated under Article XIX-A and all branch campuses of a community college or technical institute."Cost of attendance." The cost for a student to attend a community college, including tuition and fees, room and board, books, supplies and other expenses, which is used to calculate financial aid of an eligible student under 20 U.S.C. Ch. 28 Subch. IV (relating to student assistance)."Fund." The Early Childhood Educator Tuition Assistance Fund established under section 1903-I(a)."Program." The Early Childhood Educator Tuition Assistance Program established under section 1902-I(a).Section 1902-I. Early Childhood Educator Tuition Assistance Program.(a) Establishment and purpose.--The Early Childhood Educator Tuition Assistance Program is established within the agency to provide grants in the form of tuition assistance to individuals seeking an associate degree or certification in early childhood education.(b) Eligibility.--An applicant for a grant under the program shall:(1) Report a household income that is not more than 400% of the Federal poverty level.(2) Be enrolled or accepted to be enrolled in a minimum of six credit hours per semester, or its equivalent, in a credit-bearing or certification-granting early childhood education program.20250HB0780PN0801 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Have completed and submitted applications for any other Federal or State student financial aid program for which the applicant may be eligible.(4) Hold employment in an early childhood education program approved by the agency for a minimum of 25 hours per week.(5) If reapplying for a grant under the program, submit official transcripts demonstrating that the applicant:(i) Meets standards for satisfactory academic progress and maintains the required grade point average established in 20 U.S.C. Ch. 28 Subch. IV (relating to student assistance) . (ii) Is making reasonable progress to complete the applicant's specific program of study.(iii) Has not exceeded 150% of the required credits for the relevant certificate or degree.(6) Enter into a written agreement with the agency to remain employed by an early childhood education program located in this Commonwealth for not less than two years following the completion of the last semester that the grant was received.(c) Awards.--Each grant under the program:(1) Shall be in the amount equal to the cost of attendance minus the sum of any Federal grants, State grants or other scholarships or grants provided to the applicant.(2) Shall be disbursed in two equal payments, the first of which shall occur upon confirmation by the community college of the applicant's enrollment and the second of which shall occur at the end of the academic term for which the student receives the grant.20250HB0780PN0801 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) May not be granted in full if the applicant has withdrawn from the program of study.Section 1903-I. Early Childhood Educator Tuition Assistance Fund.(a) Establishment and purpose.--The Early Childhood Educator Tuition Assistance Fund is established in the State Treasury to make appropriations to the agency to carry out the provisions of this article.(b) Appropriations.--The fund shall consist of an annual appropriation or transfer from the General Fund, as well as money received from the Federal Government and any appropriations by the General Assembly for the purposes of funding the program.(c) Requests.--The agency shall request funding for the program in an amount equivalent to the obligations of the program and shall not direct money from the fund for any other purpose.Section 1904-I. Reports.(a) Publication and contents.--By September 1, 2025, and each September 1 thereafter, the agency shall publish a report that includes the following information regarding the operation of the program for the immediately preceding fiscal year:(1) Data on student enrollment, student retention rates between academic terms and years and student wages, including:(i) Median wages prior to enrollment and one year after completion of a credential or degree.(ii) Wage rates of students who have not enrolled in over a year and did not complete a credential or degree.(2) A comparison of job demand in early childhood 20250HB0780PN0801 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 education fields and the rates of completion of a credential or degree.(b) Submittal.--Each report under subsection (a) shall be submitted to:(1) The Governor.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 1905-I. Regulations and procedures.The agency shall promulgate regulations and adopt procedures necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0780PN0801 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617